Wyoming, session 2026, SF0055.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 5-13-115 by creating a new subsection
(g), 13-12-110(a) and (b), 13-12-111(b), 13-12-116 by
creating a new subsection (b) and by renumbering (b) as
(c), 13-12-117, 13-12-119(d) and 13-12-122 by creating a
new subsection (c) are amended to read:
5-13-115. Purpose and jurisdiction.
(g) The chancery court shall have jurisdiction to
hear and decide appeals of any decision of the state
banking board or the state banking commissioner appealed
under W.S. 13-12-117.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0055
ENROLLED ACT NO. 54, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
13-12-110. Required initial capital and surplus;
additional capital.
(a) The capital stock of each special purpose
depository institution chartered under this chapter shall
be subscribed for as fully paid stock. No special purpose
depository institution shall be chartered commence business
with capital stock of less than five million dollars
($5,000,000.00).
(b) No special purpose depository institution shall
commence business until the full amount of its authorized
capital is subscribed and all capital stock is fully paid
in. No special purpose depository institution may be
chartered shall commence business without a paid up surplus
fund of not less than twenty percent (20%) of its legally
authorized capital stock and undivided profits in an amount
not less than three (3) years one (1) year of estimated
operating expenses in the amount disclosed pursuant to W.S.
13-12-111(b) or in another amount required by the
commissioner.
13-12-111. Application for charter; fee; subaccount
created.
(b) The incorporators under W.S. 13-12-109(a) shall
apply to the commissioner for a charter. The application
shall contain the special purpose depository institution's
articles of incorporation, a detailed business plan, a
comprehensive estimate of operating expenses for the first
three (3) years year of operation, a complete proposal for
compliance with the provisions of this chapter and evidence
of a plan to raise the capital required under W.S.
13-12-110. The commissioner may prescribe the form of
application by rule.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0055
ENROLLED ACT NO. 54, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
13-12-116. Certificate of authority to commence
business required; application; approval or denial; failure
to commence business.
(b) The commissioner shall have the authority to
determine the requirements by rule in accordance with this
act that shall be met for an approved special purpose
depository institution to commence business.
(b)(c) If an approved special purpose depository
institution fails to commence business in good faith
compliance with the requirements imposed by the
commissioner under subsection (b) of this section, within
six (6) months one (1) year after the issuance of a
certificate of authority to operate by the commissioner,
the charter and certificate of authority shall expire. The
board, for good cause and upon an application filed prior
to the expiration of the six (6) month one (1) year period,
may extend the time within which the special purpose
depository institution may open for business.
13-12-117. Decisions by board appealable; grounds.
Any decision of the board or commissioner in approving,
conditionally approving or disapproving a charter for a
special purpose depository institution, or the issuance or
denial of a certificate of authority to operate, compliance
with the requirements for an approved special purpose
depository institution to commence business under W.S.
13-12-116(b) or the issuance or denial of an extension to
commence business under W.S. 13-12-116(c) is appealable to
the district court of the county in which the institution
is to be located, in accordance with the provisions of the
Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act or, notwithstanding
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0055
ENROLLED ACT NO. 54, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
W.S. 16-3-114(a), to the chancery court. In addition to the
grounds for appeal contained in the Wyoming Administrative
Procedure Act, an appellant may appeal if the board or the
commissioner fails to make any of the required findings or
otherwise take an action required by law.
13-12-119. Reports and examinations; supervisory
fees; required private insurance or bond.
(d) Unless the commissioner determines an exemption
is appropriate because of payment of other fees, on or
before January 31 and July 31 of each year, a special
purpose depository institution shall compute and pay
supervisory fees to the commissioner based on the total
assets of the special purpose depository institution as of
the preceding December 31 and June 30 respectively. Except
as provided in W.S. 13-12-122(c), supervisory fees under
this section shall provide for the operating costs of the
office of the commissioner and the administration of the
laws governing special purpose depository institutions.
Such Supervisory fees shall be established by rule of the
commissioner and shall be adjusted by the commissioner to
assure consistency with the cost of supervision. Except as
provided in W.S. 13-12-122(c), supervisory fees shall be
deposited by the commissioner with the state treasurer and
credited to the special purpose depository institutions
subaccount created by W.S. 13-12-111(d).
13-12-122. Failure of institution; unsound or unsafe
condition; applicability of other insolvency and
conservatorship provisions; special purpose depository
institution resolution fund account.
(c) There is created the special purpose depository
institution resolution fund account. A portion of each
4

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0055
ENROLLED ACT NO. 54, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
supervisory fee paid pursuant to W.S. 13-12-119(d) shall be
deposited in the special purpose depository institution
resolution fund account and shall be used by the
commissioner in the event of an involuntary dissolution of
a special purpose depository institution. The amount
deposited in the account shall be established by rule of
the commissioner. The portion of fees designated under this
subsection shall be remitted to the state treasurer to be
credited to the special purpose depository institution
resolution fund account. All funds within the account shall
be invested by the state treasurer and all investment
earnings from the account shall be credited to the account.
Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207,
unobligated and unexpended funds in the account shall not
lapse or revert and shall remain in the account and be
available for distribution as provided by this subsection.
Expenditures from the account shall be made using warrants
drawn by the state auditor, upon vouchers issued and signed
by the director of the department of audit or by the
commissioner. Funds from the account shall be expended only
to carry out the duties of the commissioner in the
involuntary dissolution of a special purpose depository
institution.
Section 2. W.S. 13-12-106 and 13-12-122(b)(i)(B) are
repealed.
Section 3. The banking commissioner shall promulgate
rules as necessary to implement this act.
5

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0055
ENROLLED ACT NO. 54, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 4.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.
(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
6